Washington statutes.
RCW 39.84.060

Public corporations—Limitations.

No municipality may give or lend any money or property in aid of a public corporation. The municipality that creates a public corporation shall annually review any financial statements of the public corporation and at all times shall have access to the books and records of the public corporation. No public corporation may issue revenue obligations under this chapter except upon the approval of both the municipality under the auspices of which it was created and the county, city, or town within whose planning jurisdiction the proposed industrial development facility lies. No revenue bonds may be issued pursuant to this chapter unless the board of directors of the public corporation proposing to issue revenue bonds makes a finding that in its opinion the interest paid on the bonds will be exempt from income taxation by the federal government. Revenue bonds issued by a public corporation under this chapter shall not be considered to constitute a debt of the state, of the municipality, or of any other municipal corporation, quasi municipal corporation, subdivision, or agency of this state or to pledge any or all of the faith and credit of any of these entities. The revenue bonds shall be payable solely from both the revenues derived as a result of the industrial development facilities funded by the revenue bonds, including, without limitation, amounts received under the terms of any financing document or by reason of any additional security furnished by the user of the industrial development facility in connection with the financing thereof, and money and other property received from private sources. Each revenue bond shall contain on its face statements to the effect that: (1) Neither the state, the municipality, or any other municipal corporation, quasi municipal corporation, subdivision, or agency of the state is obligated to pay the principal or the interest thereon; (2) no tax funds or governmental revenue may be used to pay the principal or interest thereon; and (3) neither any or all of the faith and credit nor the taxing power of the state, the municipality, or any other municipal corporation, quasi municipal corporation, subdivision, or agency thereof is pledged to the payment of the principal of or the interest on the revenue bond. A public corporation may incur only those financial obligations which will be paid from revenues received pursuant to financing documents, from fees or charges paid by users or prospective users of the industrial development facilities funded by the revenue bonds, or from the proceeds of revenue bonds. A public corporation established under the terms of this chapter constitutes an authority and an instrumentality (within the meaning of those terms in the regulations of the United States treasury and the rulings of the Internal Revenue Service prescribed pursuant to section 103 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954, as amended) and may act on behalf of the municipality under whose auspices it is created for the specific public purposes authorized by this chapter. The public corporation is not a municipal corporation within the meaning of the state Constitution and the laws of the state, or a political subdivision within the meaning of the state Constitution and the laws of the state, including without limitation, Article VIII, section 7, of the Washington state Constitution. A municipality shall not delegate to a public corporation any of the municipality's attributes of sovereignty, including, without limitation, the power to tax, the power of eminent domain, and the police power.

[ 1981 c 300 s 6.]